Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.010

"County road fund" created.

There is created in each county of the state a county fund to be known as the "county road fund." Any funds which accrue to any county for use upon county roads, shall be credited to and deposited in the county road fund.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 12; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.010. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 2, part; 1937 c 187 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-6, part.]